Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202518-1724
Discrimination; employment, public accommodations, and housing; ordinance to prevent.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all cities and villages in this state shall have the power by ordinance to define, regulate, suppress, and prevent discrimination on the basis of race, color, creed, religion, ancestry, sex, marital status, national origin, familial status as defined in section 20-311, disability as defined in section 20-308.01, age, or military or veteran status in employment, public accommodation, and housing and may provide for the enforcement of such ordinances by providing appropriate penalties for the violation thereof. It shall not be an unlawful employment practice to refuse employment based on a policy of not employing both spouses if such policy is equally applied to both sexes.

Laws 1971, LB 161, § 1;

Laws 1978, LB 830, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 825, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 107;

Laws 2021, LB540, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 7.